Nevada, session 83, AB246-82.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 293 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 to 8, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 2. “Limited-English proficiency” means being unable to
speak or understand English adequately to participate in the
electoral process.
Sec. 3. “Minority group” includes, without limitation, United
States citizens of Chinese heritage.
Sec. 4. “Voting materials” means the following written
materials:
1. Applications to preregister or register to vote;
2. Ballots and the instructions for the use of such ballots,
including, without limitation, mail ballots, sample ballots and
provisional ballots;
3. Voting instructions;
4. Information and instructions relating to the location of
polling places, including, without limitation, vote centers,
permanent polling places for early voting and temporary branch
polling places and the hours during which such polling places will
be open;
5. Any notices required to be provided for an election
pursuant to title 24 of NRS;
6. Ballot questions;
7. Any forms prepared for an election to assist voters; and
-
*AB246_R2*

– 4 –
8. Any other voting materials the Secretary of State requires
to be translated by a regulation adopted pursuant to section 5 of
this act.
Sec. 5. 1. The Secretary of State shall ensure that voting
materials and other elections information that is posted on the
Internet website of the Office of the Secretary of State or the
system of approved electronic transmission established pursuant to
NRS 293D.200 is available on such website and system of
approved electronic transmission in any language in which voting
materials are required to be prepared pursuant to 52 U.S.C. §
10503. If any such language does not have a standard writing
system, the information required to be posted must be set forth in
an audio recording in the language. Except as otherwise provided
in this subsection, the Secretary of State shall use a translator who
is certified in the specific language to translate the information
required pursuant to this subsection. If such a certified translator
is not available to translate the information required pursuant to
this subsection, the Secretary of State shall make a continuous
effort to find such a certified translator or coordinate with the
minority group for translation assistance.
2. Each county clerk and city clerk shall ensure that the
Internet website of the county or city clerk, as applicable, has
posted in a prominent location a link to the information on the
website of the Office of the Secretary of State required pursuant to
subsection 1.
3. The Secretary of State shall, on or before January 1 of
each odd-numbered year, review data on persons who are
members of a minority group and are of limited-English
proficiency in the State, based on the American Community
Survey conducted by the Bureau of the Census of the United
States Department of Commerce or language preference
information collected by the Secretary of State. In addition to the
requirements set forth in subsections 1 and 2, if, based on such
data:
(a) The Secretary of State finds that there are at least 5,000
qualified electors in this State who are members of a minority
group and are of limited-English proficiency, the Secretary of
State shall ensure that voting materials and other elections
information that are posted on the Internet website of the Office of
the Secretary of State or set forth in the system of approved
electronic transmission established pursuant to NRS 293D.200 are
available in the language or languages of the minority group. If
any such language does not have a standard writing system, the
information required to be posted or made available must be set
forth in an audio recording in the language. Except as otherwise
-
*AB246_R2*

– 5 –
provided in this paragraph, the Secretary of State shall use a
translator who is certified in the specific language to translate the
information required pursuant to this paragraph. If such a
certified translator is not available to translate the information
required pursuant to this paragraph, the Secretary of State shall
make a continuous effort to find such a certified translator or
coordinate with the minority group for translation assistance.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph, the
Secretary of State finds that there are at least 20,000 qualified
electors in this State who are members of a minority group and are
of limited-English proficiency, the Secretary of State shall
collaborate with each county clerk to ensure that voting materials
and other elections information that are required to be posted or
made available at a polling place or on the Internet website of the
county clerk are posted or available in the language or languages
of the minority group. If any such language does not have a
standard writing system, the information required to be posted or
made available must be set forth in an audio recording in the
language. Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph, the
Secretary of State shall use a translator who is certified in
the specific language to translate the information required
pursuant to this paragraph. If such a certified translator is not
available to translate the information required pursuant to this
paragraph, the Secretary of State shall make a continuous effort
to find such a certified translator or coordinate with the minority
group for translation assistance. The cost of preparing and
providing voting materials and other elections information in any
language required pursuant to this paragraph is a charge against
the State and must be paid from the Reserve for Statutory
Contingency Account upon recommendation by the Secretary of
State and approval by the State Board of Examiners. The
provisions of this paragraph do not apply to the extent that a
county clerk is required pursuant to paragraph (c) to ensure that
voting materials and other elections information that are required
to be posted or made available at a polling place or on the Internet
website of the county clerk are posted or available in the language
or languages of the minority group.
(c) The Secretary of State finds that there are at least 5,000
qualified electors in a county who are members of a minority
group and are of limited-English proficiency, the Secretary of
State shall notify the county clerk and the county clerk shall
ensure that voting materials and other elections information that
are required to be posted or made available at a polling place or
on the Internet website of the county clerk are posted or available
in the language or languages of the minority group. If any such
-
*AB246_R2*

– 6 –
language does not have a standard writing system, the information
required to be posted or made available must be set forth in an
audio recording in the language. Except as otherwise provided in
this paragraph, the county clerk shall use a translator who is
certified in the specific language to translate the information
required pursuant to this paragraph. If such a certified translator
is not available to translate the information required pursuant to
this paragraph, the county clerk shall make a continuous effort to
find such a certified translator or coordinate with the minority
group for translation assistance.
(d) The Secretary of State finds that there are at least 5,000
qualified electors in a city who are members of a minority group
and are of limited-English proficiency, the Secretary of State shall
notify the city clerk and the city clerk shall ensure that voting
materials and other elections information that are required to be
posted or made available at a polling place or on the Internet
website of the city clerk are posted or available in the language or
languages of the minority group. If any such language does not
have a standard writing system, the information required to be
posted or made available must be set forth in an audio recording
in the language. Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph,
the city clerk shall use a translator who is certified in the specific
language to translate the information required pursuant to this
paragraph. If such a certified translator is not available to
translate the information required pursuant to this paragraph, the
city clerk shall make a continuous effort to find such a certified
translator or coordinate with the minority group for translation
assistance.
4. The Secretary of State may adopt regulations requiring any
additional voting material that must be translated pursuant to this
section.
Sec. 6. 1. The Secretary of State shall:
(a) Establish a toll-free telephone number which may be used
by any person in this State to receive language interpretation or
translation assistance relating to an election, including, without
limitation, voter registration or other voter assistance; and
(b) Post the toll-free telephone number established pursuant to
paragraph (a) on the Internet website of the Office of the
Secretary of State.
2. A county clerk:
(a) May establish a toll-free telephone number which may be
used by any person in the county to receive language
interpretation or translation assistance relating to an election,
including, without limitation, voter registration or other voter
assistance; and
-
*AB246_R2*

– 7 –
(b) If such a toll-free telephone number is established
pursuant to paragraph (a), post the toll-free telephone number on
the Internet website of the county clerk.
3. Each county and city clerk shall post the toll-free
telephone number established by the Secretary of State pursuant
to subsection 1 on the Internet website of the county or city clerk,
as applicable.
Sec. 7. The county clerk shall ensure that at each polling
place for early voting the toll-free telephone number established
by the Secretary of State and, if applicable, the toll-free number
established by the county clerk pursuant to section 6 of this act for
a voter to receive voter registration and other voter assistance
during the period for early voting is posted in a conspicuous place.
Sec. 8. 1. The Secretary of State shall include on all forms
for an application to preregister or register to vote prescribed by
the Secretary of State, including, without limitation, a paper
application and the form set forth on the system established by the
Secretary of State pursuant to NRS 293.671 to allow persons to
register to vote by computer, the following language in at least 14-
point bold type:

[ ] CHECK THIS BOX TO RECEIVE A SAMPLE
BALLOT IN A LANGUAGE OTHER THAN
ENGLISH AND INCLUDE THE PREFERRED
LANGUAGE HERE __________

PLEASE NOTE THAT NOT ALL LANGUAGES
ARE AVAILABLE, BUT LANGUAGE INFORMATION
THAT IS COLLECTED WILL HELP DETERMINE THE
LANGUAGE NEEDS OF VOTERS AND THE SERVICES
PROVIDED BY THE STATE, COUNTY AND CITY.

2. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the county
clerk and city clerk of the county and city where the voter is
registered to vote must provide the voter who has indicated a
preferred language other than English with a sample ballot in the
preferred language. If, pursuant to section 5 of this act, a county
or city clerk is not required to provide voting materials in the
preferred language of the voter, the county or city clerk, as
applicable, must provide the voter with a sample ballot in English
until the clerk is required, pursuant to section 5 of this act, to
provide voting materials in such language.
Sec. 9. NRS 293.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.010 As used in this title, unless the context otherwise
requires, the words and terms defined in NRS 293.016 to 293.121,
-
*AB246_R2*

– 8 –
inclusive, and sections 2, 3 and 4 of this act, have the meanings
ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 10. NRS 293.217 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.217 1. The county clerk of each county shall appoint and
notify registered voters to act as election board officers for the
various polling places in the county as provided in NRS 293.220 to
293.227, inclusive, and NRS 293.269929. The county clerk shall
make a good faith effort to appoint election board officers who are
bilingual in a language that voting materials are required to be
provided in pursuant to section 5 of this act. The registered voters
appointed as election board officers for any polling place must not
all be of the same political party. No candidate for nomination or
election or a relative of the candidate within the second degree of
consanguinity or affinity may be appointed as an election board
officer. Immediately after election board officers are appointed, if
requested by the county clerk, the sheriff shall:
(a) Appoint a deputy sheriff for each polling place in the county
and for the central election board or the mail ballot central counting
board; or
(b) Deputize as a deputy sheriff for the election an election
board officer of each polling place in the county and for the central
election board or the mail ballot central counting board. The
deputized officer shall receive no additional compensation for
services rendered as a deputy sheriff during the election for which
the officer is deputized.
 Deputy sheriffs so appointed and deputized shall preserve order
during hours of voting and attend closing of the polls.
2. The county clerk may appoint a trainee for the position of
election board officer as set forth in NRS 293.2175.
Sec. 11. NRS 293.2549 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.2549 1. The Secretary of State, each county clerk and
each city clerk shall:
(a) Make the Voters’ Bill of Rights readily available to the
public;
(b) Maintain a copy of the Voters’ Bill of Rights in his or her
office for reproduction and distribution to the public; [and]
(c) Ensure that the Voters’ Bill of Rights is posted in a
conspicuous place, in at least 12-point type, at each polling place [.]
; and
(d) Ensure that the Voters’ Bill of Rights is available in all of
the languages that voting materials are required to be provided in
pursuant to section 5 of this act.
2. The Secretary of State shall ensure that the Voters’ Bill of
Rights is posted on the Secretary of State’s Internet website [.] and
-
*AB246_R2*

– 9 –
available in all of the languages that voting materials are required
to be provided in pursuant to section 5 of this act.
Sec. 12. NRS 293.2699 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.2699 1. Each voting system used by a county or city
shall provide voting materials in:
(a) English; [and]
(b) Every language in which voting materials are required to be
prepared in the county or city pursuant to 52 U.S.C. § 10503 [.] ;
and
(c) Every other language in which voting materials are
required to be prepared in the county or city pursuant to section 5
of this act.
2. In addition to the requirements set forth in subsection 1, if a
county clerk or city clerk determines that there is a significant and
substantial need for voting materials of the county or city, as
applicable, to be provided in the language or languages of a
minority group, the county clerk or city clerk may prepare voting
materials in such language or languages. For the purposes of this
subsection, there is a significant and substantial need for voting
materials to be provided in the language or languages of a minority
group if, without limitation, the minority group has been subject to
historical discrimination and unequal educational opportunities, and,
as a result, members of the minority group are of limited-English
proficiency.
[3. As used in this section:
(a) “Limited-English proficiency” means being unable to speak
or understand English adequately to participate in the electoral
process.
(b) “Minority group” includes, without limitation, United States
citizens of Chinese heritage.
(c) “Voting materials” has the meaning ascribed to it in 52
U.S.C. § 10503.]
Sec. 13. NRS 293.269911 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
293.269911 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section,
the county clerk shall prepare and distribute to each active registered
voter in the county and each person who registers to vote or updates
his or her voter registration information not later than the 14 days
before the election a mail ballot for every election. The county clerk
shall make reasonable accommodations for the use of the mail ballot
by a person who is elderly or disabled, including, without limitation,
by providing, upon request, the mail ballot in 12-point type to a
person who is elderly or disabled. If a county clerk is required to
provide voting materials pursuant to section 5 of this act in a
language that a registered voter has indicated is his or her
-
*AB246_R2*

– 10 –
preferred language, the county clerk shall prepare and distribute a
mail ballot and all relevant materials and instructions for voting
the mail ballot in the preferred language of the voter.
2. The county clerk shall allow a voter to elect not to receive a
mail ballot pursuant to this section by submitting to the county clerk
a written notice in the form prescribed by the county clerk which
must be received by the county clerk not later than 60 days before
the day of the election.
3. The county clerk shall not distribute a mail ballot to any
person who:
(a) Registers to vote for the election pursuant to the provisions
of NRS 293.5772 to 293.5887, inclusive; or
(b) Elects not to receive a mail ballot pursuant to subsection 2.
4. The mail ballot must include all offices, candidates and
measures upon which the voter is entitled to vote at the election.
5. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 2 and 3, the
mail ballot must be distributed to:
(a) Each active registered voter who:
(1) Resides within the State, not later than 20 days before the
election; and
(2) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (c), resides
outside the State, not later than 40 days before the election.
(b) Each active registered voter who registers to vote after the
dates set for distributing mail ballots pursuant to paragraph (a) but
who is eligible to receive a mail ballot pursuant to subsection 1, not
later than 13 days before the election.
(c) Each covered voter who is entitled to have a military-
overseas ballot transmitted pursuant to the provisions of chapter
293D of NRS or the Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee
Voting Act, 52 U.S.C. §§ 20301 et seq., not later than the time
required by those provisions.
6. In the case of a special election where no candidate for
federal office will appear on the ballot, the mail ballot must be
distributed to each active registered voter not later than 15 days
before the special election.
7. Any untimely legal action which would prevent the mail
ballot from being distributed to any voter pursuant to this section is
moot and of no effect.
Sec. 14. NRS 293.3025 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.3025 The Secretary of State and each county and city clerk
shall ensure that a copy of each of the following is posted in a
conspicuous place at each polling place on election day:
1. A sample ballot;
2. Information concerning the date and hours of operation of
the polling place;
-
*AB246_R2*

– 11 –
3. Instructions for voting and casting a ballot, including a
provisional ballot pursuant to NRS 293.3078 to 293.3086, inclusive,
or a provisional ballot pursuant to NRS 293.5772 to 293.5887,
inclusive;
4. Instructions concerning the identification required for
persons who registered by mail or computer and are first-time voters
for federal office in this State;
5. Information concerning the accessibility of polling places to
persons with disabilities;
6. Instructions concerning how a registered voter may obtain
a copy of voting materials in each of the languages that voting
materials are required to be prepared in pursuant to section 5 of
this act;
7. The toll-free telephone number established by the
Secretary of State and, if applicable, the toll-free number
established by the county clerk pursuant to section 6 of this act for
obtaining language interpretation or translation assistance
relating to the election;
8. General information concerning federal and state laws which
prohibit acts of fraud and misrepresentation; and
[7.] 9. Information concerning the eligibility of a candidate, a
ballot question or any other matter appearing on the ballot as a result
of a judicial determination or by operation of law, if any.
Sec. 15. NRS 293.4687 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.4687 1. The Secretary of State shall maintain a website
on the Internet for public information maintained, collected or
compiled by the Secretary of State that relates to elections, which
must include, without limitation:
(a) The Voters’ Bill of Rights required to be posted on the
Secretary of State’s Internet website pursuant to the provisions of
NRS 293.2549;
(b) The abstract of votes required to be posted on a website
pursuant to the provisions of NRS 293.388;
(c) A current list of the registered voters in this State that also
indicates the petition district in which each registered voter resides;
(d) A map or maps indicating the boundaries of each petition
district; [and]
(e) All reports submitted to the Secretary of State pursuant to the
provisions of chapter 294A of NRS [.] ; and
(f) The toll-free telephone number established by the Secretary
of State pursuant to section 6 of this act.
2. The information required to be maintained by the
Secretary of State pursuant to subsection 1 shall be available in all
of the languages that voting materials are required to be prepared
in pursuant to section 5 of this act.
-
*AB246_R2*

– 12 –
3. The abstract of votes required to be maintained on the
website pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection 1 must be
maintained in such a format as to permit the searching of the
abstract of votes for specific information.
[3.] 4. If the information required to be maintained by the
Secretary of State pursuant to subsection 1 may be obtained by the
public from a website on the Internet maintained by a county clerk
or city clerk, the Secretary of State may provide a hyperlink to that
website to comply with the provisions of subsection 1 with regard to
that information.
Sec. 16. NRS 293.4689 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.4689 1. If a county clerk maintains a website on the
Internet for information related to elections, the website must
contain public information maintained, collected or compiled by the
county clerk that relates to elections, which must include, without
limitation:
(a) The locations of polling places for casting a ballot on
election day in such a format that a registered voter may search the
list to determine the location of the polling place or places at which
the registered voter is entitled to cast a ballot; [and]
(b) The abstract of votes required pursuant to the provisions of
NRS 293.388 [.] ; and
(c) The toll-free telephone number established by the Secretary
of State and, if applicable, the toll-free number established by the
county clerk pursuant to section 6 of this act.
2. The abstract of votes required to be maintained on the
website pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection 1 must be
maintained in such a format as to permit the searching of the
abstract of votes for specific information.
3. The information required to be maintained by a county
clerk pursuant to subsection 1 shall be available on the website in
all of the languages that voting materials are required to be
prepared in the county pursuant to section 5 of this act.
4. If the information required to be maintained by a county
clerk pursuant to subsection 1 may be obtained by the public from a
website on the Internet maintained by the Secretary of State, another
county clerk or a city clerk, the county clerk may provide a
hyperlink to that website to comply with the provisions of
subsection 1 with regard to that information.
Sec. 17. NRS 293.507 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.507 1. The Secretary of State shall prescribe:
(a) Standard forms for applications to preregister or register to
vote;
-
*AB246_R2*

– 13 –
(b) Special forms for preregistration and registration to be used
in a county where registrations are performed and records of
registration are kept by computer; and
(c) A standard form for the affidavit described in subsection 5.
2. The county clerks shall provide forms for applications to
preregister or register to vote to field registrars in the form and
number prescribed by the Secretary of State.
3. Each form for an application to preregister or register to vote
must include a:
(a) Unique control number assigned by the Secretary of State;
and
(b) Receipt which:
(1) Includes a space for a person assisting an applicant in
completing the form to enter the person’s name; and
(2) May be retained by the applicant upon completion of the
form.
4. The form for an application to preregister or register to vote
must include:
(a) A line for use by the applicant to enter:
(1) The number indicated on the applicant’s current and valid
driver’s license issued by the Department of Motor Vehicles, if the
applicant has such a driver’s license;
(2) The last four digits of the applicant’s social security
number, if the applicant does not have a driver’s license issued by
the Department of Motor Vehicles and does have a social security
number; or
(3) The number issued to the applicant pursuant to subsection
5, if the applicant does not have a current and valid driver’s license
issued by the Department of Motor Vehicles or a social security
number.
(b) A line on which to enter the address at which the applicant
actually resides, as set forth in NRS 293.486.
(c) A notice that the applicant may not list a business as the
address required pursuant to paragraph (b) unless the applicant
actually resides there.
(d) A line on which to enter an address at which the applicant
may receive mail, including, without limitation, a post office box or
general delivery.
(e) A line on which to enter the applicant’s state or country of
birth and a language preference.
5. If an applicant does not have the identification set forth in
subparagraph (1) or (2) of paragraph (a) of subsection 4, the
applicant shall sign an affidavit stating that he or she does not have a
current and valid driver’s license issued by the Department of Motor
Vehicles or a social security number. Upon receipt of the affidavit,
-
*AB246_R2*

– 14 –
the county clerk shall issue an identification number to the applicant
which must be the same number as the unique identifier assigned to
the applicant for purposes of the statewide voter registration list.
6. The Secretary of State shall adopt regulations to carry out
the provisions of subsections 3, 4 and 5.
Sec. 18. NRS 293.565 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.565 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3,
sample ballots must include:
(a) If applicable, the statement required by NRS 293.267;
(b) The fiscal note or description of anticipated financial effect,
as provided pursuant to NRS 218D.810, 293.250, 293.481, 295.015,
295.095 or 295.230 for each proposed constitutional amendment,
statewide measure, measure to be voted upon only by a special
district or political subdivision and advisory question;
(c) An explanation, as provided pursuant to NRS 218D.810,
293.250, 293.481, 295.121 or 295.230, of each proposed
constitutional amendment, statewide measure, measure to be voted
upon only by a special district or political subdivision and advisory
question;
(d) Arguments for and against each proposed constitutional
amendment, statewide measure, measure to be voted upon only by a
special district or political subdivision and advisory question, and
rebuttals to each argument, as provided pursuant to NRS 218D.810,
293.250, 293.252 or 295.121; and
(e) The full text of each proposed constitutional amendment.
2. If, pursuant to the provisions of NRS 293.2565, the word
“Incumbent” must appear on the ballot next to the name of the
candidate who is the incumbent, the word “Incumbent” must appear
on the sample ballot next to the name of the candidate who is the
incumbent.
3. Sample ballots that are mailed to registered voters may be
printed without the full text of each proposed constitutional
amendment if:
(a) The cost of printing the sample ballots would be significantly
reduced if the full text of each proposed constitutional amendment
were not included;
(b) The county clerk ensures that a sample ballot that includes
the full text of each proposed constitutional amendment is provided
at no charge to each registered voter who requests such a sample
ballot; and
(c) The sample ballots provided to each polling place include the
full text of each proposed constitutional amendment.
4. A county clerk may establish a system for distributing
sample ballots by electronic means to each registered voter who
elects to receive a sample ballot by electronic means. Such a system
-
*AB246_R2*

– 15 –
may include, without limitation, electronic mail or electronic access
through an Internet website. If a county clerk establishes such a
system and a registered voter elects to receive a sample ballot by
electronic means, the county clerk shall distribute the sample ballot
to the registered voter by electronic means pursuant to the
procedures and requirements set forth by regulations adopted by the
Secretary of State.
5. If a registered voter does not elect to receive a sample ballot
by electronic means pursuant to subsection 4, the county clerk shall
distribute the sample ballot to the registered voter by mail.
6. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 7, before the
period for early voting for any election begins, the county clerk shall
distribute to each registered voter in the county by mail or electronic
means, as applicable, the sample ballot for his or her precinct, with a
notice informing the voter of the location of his or her polling place
or places. If the location of the polling place or places has changed
since the last election:
(a) The county clerk shall mail a notice of the change to each
registered voter in the county not sooner than 10 days before
distributing the sample ballots; or
(b) The sample ballot must also include a notice in bold type
immediately above the location which states:

NOTICE: THE LOCATION OF YOUR POLLING PLACE OR
PLACES HAS CHANGED SINCE THE LAST ELECTION

7. If a person registers to vote less than 20 days before the date
of an election, the county clerk is not required to distribute to the
person the sample ballot for that election by mail or electronic
means.
8. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 9, a sample
ballot required to be distributed pursuant to this section must:
(a) Be prepared in at least 12-point type . [; and]
(b) Include on the front page, in a separate box created by bold
lines, a notice prepared in at least 20-point bold type that states:

NOTICE: TO RECEIVE A SAMPLE BALLOT IN
LARGE TYPE, CALL (Insert appropriate telephone number)

(c) Include on the front page, in a separate box created by bold
lines, a notice that states:

NOTICE: TO RECEIVE A SAMPLE BALLOT IN
A LANGUAGE OTHER THAN ENGLISH, CALL
(Insert appropriate telephone number)
-
*AB246_R2*

– 16 –
PLEASE NOTE THAT NOT ALL LANGUAGES
ARE AVAILABLE, BUT LANGUAGE INFORMATION
THAT IS COLLECTED WILL HELP DETERMINE THE
LANGUAGE NEEDS OF VOTERS AND THE SERVICES
PROVIDED BY THE STATE AND COUNTY

9. A portion of a sample ballot that contains a facsimile of the
display area of a voting device may include material in less than 12-
point type to the extent necessary to make the facsimile fit on the
pages of the sample ballot.
10. The sample ballot distributed to a person who requests a
sample ballot in large type by exercising the option provided
pursuant to NRS 293.508, or in any other manner, must be prepared
in at least 14-point type, or larger when practicable.
11. If a person requests a sample ballot in large type, the
county clerk shall ensure that all future sample ballots distributed to
that person from the county are in large type.
12. If a person requests a sample ballot in a language other
than English and the county clerk is required to provide voting
materials in such language pursuant to section 5 of this act, the
county clerk shall ensure that all sample ballots distributed to that
person in the future are provided in the preferred language. If,
pursuant to section 5 of this act, a county clerk is not required to
provide voting materials in the preferred language of the voter, the
county clerk must provide the voter with a sample ballot in
English until the clerk is required, pursuant to section 5 of this
act, to provide voting materials in such language.
13. The county clerk shall ensure that a sample ballot is
available at each polling place, including, without limitation, a
polling place for early voting in each language in which the
county clerk is required to provide information and voting
materials pursuant to section 5 of this act.
14. The county clerk shall include in each sample ballot a
statement indicating that the county clerk will, upon request of a
voter who is elderly or disabled, make reasonable accommodations
to allow the voter to vote at his or her polling place or places and
provide reasonable assistance to the voter in casting his or her vote,
including, without limitation, providing appropriate materials to
assist the voter. In addition, if the county clerk has provided
pursuant to subsection 4 of NRS 293.2955 for the placement at
centralized voting locations of specially equipped voting devices for
use by voters who are elderly or disabled, the county clerk shall
include in the sample ballot a statement indicating:
(a) The addresses of such centralized voting locations;
-
*AB246_R2*

– 17 –
(b) The types of specially equipped voting devices available at
such centralized voting locations; and
(c) That a voter who is elderly or disabled may cast his or her
ballot at such a centralized voting location rather than at his or her
regularly designated polling place or places.
[13.] 15. The cost of distributing sample ballots for any
election other than a primary election, presidential preference
primary election or general election must be borne by the political
subdivision holding the election.
Sec. 19. NRS 293.671 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.671 1. The Secretary of State shall establish a system on
the Internet website of the Office of the Secretary of State to allow
persons by computer to:
(a) Preregister and register to vote;
(b) Cancel his or her preregistration or voter registration;
(c) Update his or her preregistration or voter registration
information, including, without limitation, the person’s name,
address , [and] party affiliation [;] and language preference; and
(d) Determine at what polling place or places he or she is
entitled to vote.
2. The system established pursuant to subsection 1 must:
(a) Be user friendly;
(b) Be accessible in each language in which the Secretary of
State is required to provide information and voting materials
pursuant to section 5 of this act;
(c) Comply with any procedures and requirements prescribed by
the Secretary of State pursuant to NRS 293.250 and 293.4855; and
[(c)] (d) Inform any person who uses the system to register to
vote for an election pursuant to NRS 293.5837, 293.5842 and
293.5847 that the person may vote in the election only if the person
complies with the applicable requirements established by those
sections.
3. The Secretary of State shall include on the system, in black
lettering and not more than 14-point type, the following
information:
(a) The qualifications to register or preregister to vote;
(b) That if the applicant does not meet the qualifications, he or
she is prohibited from registering or preregistering to vote; and
(c) The penalties for submitting a false application.
4. The Secretary of State shall not include on the system:
(a) Any additional warnings regarding the penalties for
submitting a false application; or
(b) The notice set forth in NRS 225.083.
-
*AB246_R2*

– 18 –
Sec. 20. NRS 293.675 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.675 1. The Secretary of State shall establish and
maintain a centralized, top-down database that collects and stores
information related to the preregistration of persons and the
registration of electors from all the counties in this State. The
Secretary of State shall ensure that the database is capable of storing
preregistration information separately until a person is qualified to
register to vote. Each county clerk shall use the database created by
the Secretary of State pursuant to this subsection to collect and
maintain all records of preregistration and registration to vote.
2. The Secretary of State shall use the voter registration
information collected in the database created pursuant to subsection
1 to create the official statewide voter registration list, which may be
maintained on the Internet, in consultation with each county and city
clerk.
3. The statewide voter registration list must:
(a) Be a uniform, centralized and interactive computerized list;
(b) Serve as the single method for storing and managing the
official list of registered voters in this State;
(c) Serve as the official list of registered voters for the conduct
of all elections in this State;
(d) Contain the name , state or country of birth, language
preference and other registration information of every legally
registered voter in this State;
(e) Include a unique identifier assigned by the Secretary of State
to each legally registered voter in this State;
(f) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 9, be coordinated
with the appropriate databases of other agencies in this State;
(g) Be electronically accessible to each state and local election
official in this State at all times;
(h) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 10, allow for
data to be shared with other states under certain circumstances; and
(i) Be regularly maintained to ensure the integrity of the
registration process and the election process.
4. Each county and city clerk shall:
(a) Electronically enter into the database created pursuant to
subsection 1 all information related to voter preregistration and
registration obtained by the county or city clerk at the time the
information is provided to the county or city clerk; and
(b) Provide the Secretary of State with information concerning
the voter registration of the county or city and other reasonable
information requested by the Secretary of State in the form required
by the Secretary of State to establish or maintain the statewide voter
registration list.
-
*AB246_R2*

– 19 –
5. In establishing and maintaining the statewide voter
registration list, the Secretary of State shall enter into a cooperative
agreement with the Department of Motor Vehicles to match
information in the database of the statewide voter registration list
with information in the appropriate database of the Department of
Motor Vehicles to verify the accuracy of the information in an
application to register to vote.
6. The Department of Motor Vehicles shall enter into an
agreement with the Social Security Administration pursuant to 52
U.S.C. § 21083, to verify the accuracy of information in an
application to register to vote.
7. The Department of Motor Vehicles shall ensure that its
database:
(a) Is capable of processing any information related to an
application to register to vote, an application to update voter
registration information or a request to verify the accuracy of voter
registration information as quickly as is feasible; and
(b) Does not limit the number of applications to register to vote,
applications to update voter registration information or requests to
verify the accuracy of voter registration information that may be
processed by the database in any given day.
8. The Secretary of State shall enter into a cooperative
agreement with the State Registrar of Vital Statistics to match
information in the database of the statewide voter registration list
with information in the records of the State Registrar of Vital
Statistics concerning the death of a resident of this State to maintain
the statewide voter registration list. The Secretary of State must
compare the records of the State Registrar of Vital Statistics to those
in the statewide voter registration list at least once per month.
9. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 481.063 or any
provision of law providing for the confidentiality of information, the
Secretary of State may enter into an agreement with an agency of
this State pursuant to which the agency provides to the Secretary of
State any information in the possession of the agency that the
Secretary of State deems necessary to maintain the statewide voter
registration list.
10. The Secretary of State may:
(a) Request from the chief officer of elections of another state
any information which the Secretary of State deems necessary to
maintain the statewide voter registration list; and
(b) Provide to the chief officer of elections of another state any
information which is requested and which the Secretary of State
deems necessary for the chief officer of elections of that state to
maintain a voter registration list, if the Secretary of State is satisfied
-
*AB246_R2*

– 20 –
that the information provided pursuant to this paragraph will be used
only for the maintenance of that voter registration list.
Sec. 21. Chapter 293B of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
If the mechanical voting system used in a county or city is
capable of providing a registered voter’s ballot in the preferred
language of the voter other than English, the county or city clerk,
as applicable, shall ensure that the list of offices and candidates
and the statements of measures for which the voter is entitled to
vote is in that preferred language.
Sec. 22. Chapter 293C of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
The city clerk shall ensure that at each polling place for early
voting the applicable toll-free telephone number established by the
Secretary of State pursuant to section 6 of this act for a voter to
receive voter registration and other voter assistance during the
period for early voting is posted in a conspicuous place.
Sec. 23. NRS 293C.110 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293C.110 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 293.5817
and 293C.263 to 293C.26337, inclusive, the conduct of any city
election is under the control of the governing body of the city, and it
shall, by ordinance, provide for the holding of the election, appoint
the necessary election officers and election boards and do all other
things required to carry the election into effect.
2. The governing body of the city may provide for the conduct
of early voting by personal appearance in a city election pursuant to
NRS 293.5772 to 293.5887, inclusive, and 293C.355 to 293C.361,
inclusive [.] and section 22 of this act.
Sec. 24. NRS 293C.112 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293C.112 1. The governing body of a city may conduct a city
election in which all ballots must be cast by mail in accordance with
the provisions of NRS 293C.263 to 293C.26337, inclusive, if:
(a) The election is a special election; or
(b) The election is a primary city election or general city
election in which the ballot includes only:
(1) Offices and ballot questions that may be voted on by the
registered voters of only one ward; or
(2) One office or ballot question.
2. The provisions of NRS 293.5772 to 293.5887, inclusive,
293C.265 to 293C.302, inclusive, and 293C.355 to 293C.361,
inclusive, and section 22 of this act, do not apply to an election
conducted pursuant to this section.
Sec. 25. NRS 293C.220 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293C.220 1. The city clerk shall appoint and notify registered
voters to act as election board officers for the various polling places
-
*AB246_R2*

– 21 –
and precincts in the city as provided in NRS 293.225, 293.227,
293C.227, 293C.228 and 293C.26329. The city clerk shall make a
good faith effort to appoint election board officers who are
bilingual in a language that voting materials are required to be
provided in pursuant to section 5 of this act. No candidate for
nomination or election or a relative of the candidate within the
second degree of consanguinity or affinity may be appointed as an
election board officer. Immediately after election board officers are
appointed, if requested by the city clerk, the chief law enforcement
officer of the city shall:
(a) Appoint an officer for each polling place in the city and for
the central election board and the mail ballot central counting board;
or
(b) Deputize, as an officer for the election, an election board
officer for each polling place and for the central election board and
the mail ballot central counting board. The deputized officer may
not receive any additional compensation for the services he or she
provides as an officer during the election for which the officer is
deputized.
 Officers so appointed and deputized shall preserve order during
hours of voting and attend the closing of the polls.
2. The city clerk may appoint a trainee for the position of
election board officer as set forth in NRS 293C.222.
Sec. 26. NRS 293C.263 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293C.263 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the
city clerk shall prepare and distribute to each active registered voter
in the city and each person who registers to vote or updates his or
her voter registration information not later than the 14 days before
the election a mail ballot for every election. The city clerk shall
make reasonable accommodations for the use of the mail ballot by a
person who is elderly or disabled, including, without limitation, by
providing, upon request, the mail ballot in 12-point type to a person
who is elderly or disabled. If a city clerk is required to provide
voting materials pursuant to section 5 of this act in a language
that a registered voter has indicated is his or her preferred
language, the city clerk shall prepare and distribute a mail ballot
and all relevant materials and instructions for voting the mail
ballot in the preferred language of the voter.
2. The city clerk shall allow a voter to elect not to receive a
mail ballot pursuant to this section by submitting to the city clerk a
written notice in the form prescribed by the city clerk which must be
received by the city clerk not later than 60 days before the day of the
election.
3. The city clerk shall not distribute a mail ballot to any person
who:
-
*AB246_R2*

– 22 –
(a) Registers to vote for the election pursuant to the provisions
of NRS 293.5772 to 293.5887, inclusive; or
(b) Elects not to receive a mail ballot pursuant to subsection 2.
4. The mail ballot must include all offices, candidates and
measures upon which the voter is entitled to vote at the election.
5. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 2 and 3, the
mail ballot must be distributed to:
(a) Each active registered voter who:
(1) Resides within the State, not later than 20 days before the
election; and
(2) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b), resides
outside the State, not later than 40 days before the election.
(b) Each active registered voter who registers to vote after the
dates set for distributing mail ballots pursuant to paragraph (a) but
who is eligible to receive a mail ballot pursuant to subsection 1, not
later than 13 days before the election.
(c) Each covered voter who is entitled to have a military-
overseas ballot transmitted pursuant to the provisions of chapter
293D of NRS or the Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee
Voting Act, 52 U.S.C. §§ 20301 et seq., not later than the time
required by those provisions.
6. In the case of a special election where no candidate for
federal office will appear on the ballot, the mail ballot must be
distributed to each active registered voter not later than 15 days
before the special election.
7. Any untimely legal action which would prevent the mail
ballot from being distributed to any voter pursuant to this section is
moot and of no effect.
Sec. 27. NRS 293C.530 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293C.530 1. A city clerk may establish a system for
distributing sample ballots by electronic means to each registered
voter who elects to receive a sample ballot by electronic means.
Such a system may include, without limitation, electronic mail or
electronic access through an Internet website. If a city clerk
establishes such a system and a registered voter elects to receive a
sample ballot by electronic means, the city clerk shall distribute the
sample ballot to the registered voter by electronic means pursuant to
the procedures and requirements set forth by regulations adopted by
the Secretary of State.
2. If a registered voter does not elect to receive a sample ballot
by electronic means pursuant to subsection 1, the city clerk shall
distribute the sample ballot to the registered voter by mail.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, before the
period for early voting for any election begins, the city clerk shall
distribute to each registered voter in the city by mail or electronic
-
*AB246_R2*

– 23 –
means, as applicable, the sample ballot for his or her precinct, with a
notice informing the voter of the location of his or her polling place
or places. If the location of the polling place or places has changed
since the last election:
(a) The city clerk shall mail a notice of the change to each
registered voter in the city not sooner than 10 days before
distributing the sample ballots; or
(b) The sample ballot must also include a notice in bold type
immediately above the location which states:

NOTICE: THE LOCATION OF YOUR POLLING PLACE OR
PLACES HAS CHANGED SINCE THE LAST ELECTION

4. If a person registers to vote less than 20 days before the date
of an election, the city clerk is not required to distribute to the
person the sample ballot for that election by mail or electronic
means.
5. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 7, a sample
ballot required to be distributed pursuant to this section must:
(a) Be prepared in at least 12-point type . [;]
(b) Include the description of the anticipated financial effect and
explanation of each citywide measure and advisory question,
including arguments for and against the measure or question, as
required pursuant to NRS 295.205 or 295.217 . [; and]
(c) Include on the front page, in a separate box created by bold
lines, a notice prepared in at least 20-point bold type that states:

NOTICE: TO RECEIVE A SAMPLE BALLOT IN
LARGE TYPE, CALL (Insert appropriate telephone number)

(d) Include on the front page, in a separate box created by bold
lines, a notice that states:

NOTICE: TO RECEIVE A SAMPLE BALLOT IN
A LANGUAGE OTHER THAN ENGLISH, CALL
(Insert appropriate telephone number)

PLEASE NOTE THAT NOT ALL LANGUAGES
ARE AVAILABLE, BUT LANGUAGE INFORMATION
THAT IS COLLECTED WILL HELP DETERMINE THE
LANGUAGE NEEDS OF VOTERS AND THE SERVICES
PROVIDED BY THE STATE AND CITY
-
*AB246_R2*

– 24 –
6. The word “Incumbent” must appear on the sample ballot
next to the name of the candidate who is the incumbent, if required
pursuant to NRS 293.2565.
7. A portion of a sample ballot that contains a facsimile of the
display area of a voting device may include material in less than 12-
point type to the extent necessary to make the facsimile fit on the
pages of the sample ballot.
8. The sample ballot distributed to a person who requests a
sample ballot in large type by exercising the option provided
pursuant to NRS 293.508, or in any other manner, must be prepared
in at least 14-point type, or larger when practicable.
9. If a person requests a sample ballot in large type, the city
clerk shall ensure that all future sample ballots distributed to that
person from the city are in large type.
10. If a person requests a sample ballot in a language other
than English and the city clerk is required to provide voting
materials in such language pursuant to section 5 of this act, the
city clerk shall ensure that all sample ballots distributed to that
person in the future are provided in the preferred language. If,
pursuant to section 5 of this act, a city clerk is not required to
provide voting materials in the preferred language of the voter, the
city clerk must provide the voter with a sample ballot in English
until the clerk is required, pursuant to section 5 of this act, to
provide voting materials in such language.
11. The city clerk shall ensure that a sample ballot is
available at each polling place, including, without limitation, a
polling place for early voting in each language in which the city
clerk is required to provide information and voting materials
pursuant to section 5 of this act.
12. The city clerk shall include in each sample ballot a
statement indicating that the city clerk will, upon request of a voter
who is elderly or disabled, make reasonable accommodations to
allow the voter to vote at his or her polling place or places and
provide reasonable assistance to the voter in casting his or her vote,
including, without limitation, providing appropriate materials to
assist the voter. In addition, if the city clerk has provided pursuant to
subsection 4 of NRS 293C.281 for the placement at centralized
voting locations of specially equipped voting devices for use by
voters who are elderly or disabled, the city clerk shall include in the
sample ballot a statement indicating:
(a) The addresses of such centralized voting locations;
(b) The types of specially equipped voting devices available at
such centralized voting locations; and
-
*AB246_R2*

– 25 –
(c) That a voter who is elderly or disabled may cast his or her
ballot at such a centralized voting location rather than at the voter’s
regularly designated polling place or places.
[11.] 13. The cost of distributing sample ballots for a city
election must be borne by the city holding the election.
Sec. 28. NRS 293C.715 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293C.715 1. If a city clerk maintains a website on the
Internet for information relating to elections, the website must
contain public information maintained, collected or compiled by the
city clerk that relates to elections, which must include, without
limitation:
(a) The locations of polling places for casting a ballot on
election day in such a form that a registered voter may search the list
to determine the location of the polling place or places at which the
registered voter is entitled to cast a ballot; [and]
(b) The abstract of votes required to be posted on a website
pursuant to the provisions of NRS 293C.387 [.] ; and
(c) The toll-free telephone number established by the Secretary
of State pursuant to section 6 of this act.
2. The abstract of votes required to be maintained on the
website pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection 1 must be
maintained in such a format as to permit the searching of the
abstract of votes for specific information.
3. The information required to be maintained by a city clerk
pursuant to subsection 1 shall be available on the website in all of
the languages that voting materials are required to be prepared in
the city pursuant to section 5 of this act.
4. If the information required to be maintained by a city clerk
pursuant to subsection 1 may be obtained by the public from a
website on the Internet maintained by the Secretary of State,
a county clerk or another city clerk, the city clerk may provide a
hyperlink to that website to comply with the provisions of
subsection 1 with regard to that information.
Sec. 28.5. NRS 293D.200 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
293D.200 1. The Secretary of State shall make available to
covered voters information regarding voter registration procedures
for covered voters and procedures for casting military-overseas
ballots.
2. The Secretary of State shall establish a system of approved
electronic transmission through which covered voters may apply for,
receive and send documents and other information pursuant to this
chapter. The system of approved electronic transmission must
include, without limitation, a method by which a covered voter may
provide his or her digital signature or electronic signature on any
-
*AB246_R2*

– 26 –
document or other material that is necessary for the covered voter to
register to vote, apply for a military-overseas ballot or cast a
military-overseas ballot pursuant to this chapter. The Secretary of
State shall ensure that the system is available in all languages in
which voting materials are required to be prepared and made
available pursuant to 52 U.S.C. § 10503 or section 5 of this act.
3. The Secretary of State shall develop standardized absentee-
voting materials, including, without limitation, privacy and
transmission envelopes and their electronic equivalents,
authentication materials and voting instructions, to be used with the
military-overseas ballot of a covered voter authorized to vote in any
jurisdiction in this State and, to the extent reasonably possible, shall
do so in coordination with other states.
4. The Secretary of State shall prescribe the form and content
of a declaration for use by a covered voter to swear or affirm
specific representations pertaining to the covered voter’s identity,
eligibility to vote, status as a covered voter and timely and proper
completion of a military-overseas ballot. The declaration must be
based on the declaration prescribed to accompany a federal write-in
absentee ballot under section 103 of the Uniformed and Overseas
Citizens Absentee Voting Act, 52 U.S.C. § 20303, as modified to be
consistent with this chapter. The Secretary of State shall ensure that
a form for the execution of the declaration, including an indication
of the date of execution of the declaration, is a prominent part of all
balloting materials for which the declaration is required.
5. The Secretary of State shall prescribe by regulation the
duties of a local elections official upon receipt of a military-overseas
ballot, including, without limitation, the procedures to be used by a
local elections official in accepting, handling and counting a
military-overseas ballot.
6. The Secretary of State shall prescribe the form and content
of an application for a United States citizen who is outside the
United States to preregister to vote if:
(a) The person would have been able to preregister to vote
pursuant to NRS 293.4855 except for the residency requirement;
and
(b) The last place where a parent or legal guardian of the person
was, or under this chapter would have been, eligible to vote before
leaving the United States is within this State.
Sec. 29. NRS 298.700 is hereby amended to read as follows:
298.700 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the
provisions of NRS 293.356 to 293.361, inclusive, and section 7 of
this act, apply to a presidential preference primary election.
2. The period for early voting for a presidential preference
primary election begins 10 calendar days before the date of the
-
*AB246_R2*

– 27 –
presidential preference primary election and extends through the
Friday before the day of the presidential preference primary
election.
3. The county clerk may:
(a) Include any Sunday or federal holiday that falls within the
period for early voting by personal appearance.
(b) Require a permanent polling place for early voting to remain
open until 8 p.m. on any Saturday that falls within the period for
early voting.
4. A permanent polling place for early voting must remain
open:
(a) On Monday through Friday during the period for early
voting, for at least 8 hours during such hours as the county clerk
may establish.
(b) On any Saturday that falls within the period for early voting,
for at least 4 hours during such hours as the county clerk may
establish.
(c) If the county clerk includes a Sunday that falls within the
period for early voting pursuant to subsection 3, during such hours
as the county clerk may establish.
Sec. 30. Chapter 225 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 31 to 36, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 31. As used in sections 31 to 36, inclusive, of this act,
unless the context otherwise requires, the words and terms defined
in sections 32 and 33 of this act have the meanings ascribed to
them in those sections.
Sec. 32. “Advisory Committee” means the Language Access
Advisory Committee created by section 34 of this act.
Sec. 33. “Language access programs” means a program or
service that focuses on communication barriers between persons
who cannot read, speak or write English fluently.
Sec. 34. 1. The Language Access Advisory Committee is
hereby created within the Office of the Secretary of State.
2. The Advisory Committee consists of the following members
who represent the diversity of this State, including:
(a) The Secretary of State or his or her designee;
(b) The registrar of voters of each county that has created the
office of registrar of voters pursuant to NRS 244.164;
(c) A county clerk of a county whose population is less than
100,000, appointed by the Secretary of State; and
(d) Three other members of the public appointed by the
Secretary of State.
3. The Secretary of State shall:
-
*AB246_R2*

– 28 –
(a) Consider members who have knowledge of language access
programs when appointing members of the Advisory Committee;
(b) Select the Chair of the Advisory Committee from among its
members; and
(c) Designate an employee of the Office of the Secretary of
State to serve as Secretary for the Advisory Committee.
4. The Secretary of State may assign such other employees of
his or her Office as he or she deems necessary to assist the
Advisory Committee in its duties.
5. The Chair of the Advisory Committee shall appoint a Vice
Chair from among the members of the Advisory Committee.
6. After the initial term, each member of the Advisory
Committee shall serve for a term of 2 years. Each member of the
Advisory Committee serves at the pleasure of the Secretary of
State. If a vacancy occurs, the Secretary of State shall appoint a
new member to fill the vacancy for the remainder of the unexpired
term.
7. Members of the Advisory Committee serve without
compensation. While engaged in the business of the Advisory
Committee, each member of the Advisory Committee is entitled to
receive the per diem allowance and travel expenses provided for
state officers and employees generally.
Sec. 35. 1. The Advisory Committee shall:
(a) Identify programs and services that address problems
concerning language accessibility of elections and voting
materials;
(b) Coordinate with community organizations to determine
language accessibility needs for elections and voting materials;
(c) Act as liaison between the Office of the Secretary of State
and community organizations;
(d) Make annual assessments to determine language
accessibility programs and services that could be implemented for
the election process;
(e) Make recommendations to the Office of the Secretary of
State relating to language accessibility programs and services that
should be implemented in elections.
2. As used in this section, “voting materials” has the meaning
ascribed to it in section 4 of this act.
Sec. 36. 1. The Advisory Committee shall meet at least four
times in a calendar year. One meeting must be in person. The
Advisory Committee may conduct all other meetings through
the use of remote technology systems. A special meeting of the
Advisory Committee may be called by the Secretary of State and
the Chair of the Advisory Committee at such additional times as
they deem necessary.
-
*AB246_R2*

– 29 –
2. The Chair of the Advisory Committee or, in the absence of
the Chair, the Vice Chair of the Advisory Committee, shall preside
at each meeting of the Advisory Committee.
3. A majority of the members of the Advisory Committee
constitute a quorum.
4. As used in this section, “remote technology system” has the
meaning ascribed to it in NRS 241.015.
Sec. 36.5. NRS 353.264 is hereby amended to read as follows:
353.264 1. The Reserve for Statutory Contingency Account
is hereby created in the State General Fund.
2. The State Board of Examiners shall administer the Reserve
for Statutory Contingency Account. The money in the Account must
be expended only for:
(a) The payment of claims which are obligations of the State
pursuant to NRS 41.03435, 41.0347, 62I.025, 176.485, 179.310,
212.040, 212.050, 212.070, 281.174, 282.290, 282.315, 293.253,
293.405, 298.710, 304.230, 353.120, 353.262, 412.154 and 475.235
[;] and section 5 of this act;
(b) The payment of claims which are obligations of the State
pursuant to:
(1) Chapter 472 of NRS arising from operations of the
Division of Forestry of the State Department of Conservation and
Natural Resources directly involving the protection of life and
property; and
(2) NRS 7.155, 34.750, 176A.640, 179.225 and 213.153,
 except that claims may be approved for the respective purposes
listed in this paragraph only when the money otherwise appropriated
for those purposes has been exhausted;
(c) The payment of claims which are obligations of the State
pursuant to NRS 41.0349 and 41.037, but only to the extent that the
money in the Fund for Insurance Premiums is insufficient to pay the
claims;
(d) The payment of claims which are obligations of the State
pursuant to NRS 41.950; and
(e) The payment of claims which are obligations of the State
pursuant to NRS 535.030 arising from remedial actions taken by the
State Engineer when the condition of a dam becomes dangerous to
the safety of life or property.
3. The State Board of Examiners may authorize its Clerk or a
person designated by the Clerk, under such circumstances as it
deems appropriate, to approve, on behalf of the Board, the payment
of claims from the Reserve for Statutory Contingency Account. For
the purpose of exercising any authority granted to the Clerk of the
State Board of Examiners or to the person designated by the Clerk
pursuant to this subsection, any statutory reference to the State
-
*AB246_R2*

– 30 –
Board of Examiners relating to such a claim shall be deemed to refer
to the Clerk of the Board or the person designated by the Clerk.
Sec. 36.7. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Office of the Secretary of State for personnel,
travel expenses, operating expenses, equipment and information
services expenses, vendor services relating to the expansion of
language access and the establishment of a toll-free telephone
number required by section 6 of this act the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2023-2024 .................................. $240,244
For the Fiscal Year 2024-2025 .................................. $209,332
2. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 20, 2024, and September 19, 2025, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 20, 2024, and September 19, 2025, respectively.
Sec. 37. 1. The Secretary of State shall appoint the members
of the Language Access Advisory Committee created by section 34
of this act before January 1, 2024.
2. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 34 of this act, the
members of the Language Access Advisory Committee must be
appointed to serve initial terms as follows:
(a) The member who is a county clerk of a county whose
population is less than 100,000 and one of the members who are
members of the public must be appointed to serve a term of 2 years.
(b) Two of the members who are members of the public must be
appointed to serve a term of 3 years.
Sec. 37.5. 1. The Secretary of State shall ensure that the
review of data that the Secretary of State is required to perform
pursuant to section 5 of this act is completed in sufficient time so
that voting materials may be made available by the Secretary of
State and any affected county or city clerk in any required language
for the 2024 General Election.
2. As used in this section, “voting materials” has the meaning
ascribed to it in section 4 of this act.
Sec. 38. The provisions of NRS 354.599 do not apply to any
additional expenses of a local government that are related to the
provisions of this act.
-
*AB246_R2*

– 31 –
Sec. 39. 1. This section and sections 37, 37.5 and 38 of this
act become effective upon passage and approval.
2. Section 36.7 of this act becomes effective on July 1, 2023.
3. Sections 1 to 36.5, inclusive, of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On January 1, 2024, for all other purposes.
H
-
*AB246_R2*